Illinois, session 104th, SB4006.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Sections 143.16 and 143.17 and by adding Section 6143.21e and Article XLVIII as follows: 7    (215 ILCS 5/143.16)  (from Ch. 73, par. 755.16)8    Sec. 143.16. Mailing of cancellation notice. All notices 9of cancellation of insurance to which Section 143.11 applies, 10except for those defined in subsections (a), (b) and (c) of 11Section 143.13 must be mailed at least 30 days prior to the 12effective date of cancellation during the first 60 days of 13coverage. After the coverage has been effective for 61 days or 14more, all notices must be mailed at least 60 days prior to the 15effective date of cancellation. However, where cancellation is 16for nonpayment of premium, the notice of cancellation must be 17mailed at least 10 days before the effective date of the 18cancellation. All such notices shall include a specific 19explanation of the reason or reasons for cancellation and 20shall be mailed to the named insured at the last mailing 21address known to the company. For purposes of this Section, 22the mortgagee or lien holder, if known, may opt to accept 23notification electronically.   SB4006 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19837 BAB 33287 b1(Source: P.A. 100-475, eff. 1-1-18.) 2    (215 ILCS 5/143.17)  (from Ch. 73, par. 755.17)3    Sec. 143.17. Notice of intention not to renew. 4    a. No company shall fail to renew any policy of insurance, 5as defined in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (h) of Section 6143.13, to which Section 143.11 applies, unless it shall send 7by mail to the named insured at least 60 30 days advance notice 8of its intention not to renew. The company shall maintain 9proof of mailing of such notice on a recognized U.S. Post 10Office form or a form acceptable to the U. S. Post Office or 11other commercial mail delivery service. The nonrenewal shall 12not become effective until at least 60 30 days from the proof 13of mailing date of the notice to the name insured. 14Notification shall also be sent to the insured's broker, if 15known, or the agent of record, if known, and to the last known 16mortgagee or lien holder. For purposes of this Section, the 17mortgagee or lien holder, insured's broker, or the agent of 18record may opt to accept notification electronically. However, 19where cancellation is for nonpayment of premium, the notice of 20cancellation must be mailed at least 10 days before the 21effective date of the cancellation.22    b. This Section does not apply if the company has 23manifested its willingness to renew directly to the named 24insured. Such written notice shall specify the premium amount 25payable, including any premium payment plan available, and the   SB4006 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19837 BAB 33287 b1name of any person or persons, if any, authorized to receive 2payment on behalf of the company. If no person is so 3authorized, the premium notice shall so state.4    b-5. This Section does not apply if the company manifested 5its willingness to renew directly to the named insured. 6However, no company may impose changes in deductibles or 7coverage for any policy forms applicable to an entire line of 8business enumerated in subsections (a), (b), (c), and (h) of 9Section 143.13 to which Section 143.11 applies unless the 10company mails to the named insured written notice of the 11change in deductible or coverage at least 60 days prior to the 12renewal or anniversary date. Notice shall also be sent to the 13insured's broker, if known, or the agent of record.14    c. Should a company fail to comply with (a) or (b) of this 15Section, the policy shall terminate only on the effective date 16of any similar insurance procured by the insured with respect 17to the same subject or location designated in both policies.18    d. Renewal of a policy does not constitute a waiver or 19estoppel with respect to grounds for cancellation which 20existed before the effective date of such renewal.21    e. In all notices of intention not to renew any policy of 22insurance, as defined in Section 143.11 the company shall 23provide the named insured a specific explanation of the 24reasons for nonrenewal.25    f. For purposes of this Section, the insured's broker, if 26known, or the agent of record and the mortgagee or lien holder   SB4006 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19837 BAB 33287 b1may opt to accept notification electronically. 2(Source: P.A. 100-475, eff. 1-1-18.) 3    (215 ILCS 5/143.21e new)4    Sec. 143.21e. Flood coverage; notice.5    (a) Each insurer that delivers, issues for delivery, or 6renews in this State a policy of fire and extended coverage 7that does not provide coverage for loss caused by flood shall 8provide to the insured a notice prescribed by the Director 9that explains clearly, conspicuously, and in plain language: 10        (1) the policy does not provide coverage for loss 11    caused by flood; 12        (2) whether coverage for loss caused by flood is 13    available to the applicant through the company; and 14        (3) the availability of coverage for loss caused by 15    flood through the National Flood Insurance Program, 16    whether the company can write such coverage, and how to 17    obtain coverage through the National Flood Insurance 18    Program. 19    (b) At the time of policy issuance, the company must 20obtain a written signature from the insured affirming the 21flood coverage options were presented to the applicant in 22plain language and that the applicant is declining coverage 23for loss caused by flood, if available through the company.  24    (215 ILCS 5/Art. XLVIII heading new)  SB4006 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19837 BAB 33287 b1ARTICLE XLVIII. CLIMATE RISK DISCLOSURE 2    (215 ILCS 5/1801 new)3    Sec. 1801. Short title. This Article may be referred to as 4the Climate Risk Disclosure Law. 5    (215 ILCS 5/1805 new)6    Sec. 1805. Purpose. The purpose of this Article is to 7enhance transparency about how insurers manage climate-related 8risks and to clarify the Department's authority to require 9companies to participate in the National Association of 10Insurance Commissioners' Climate Risk Disclosure Survey. 11    (215 ILCS 5/1810 new)12    Sec. 1810. Applicability. This Article applies to every 13company licensed in Illinois under Classes 1, 2, or 3 of 14Section 4 of this Code and every dental service plan 15corporation, health maintenance organization, or limited 16health service organization licensed in Illinois when such 17company, corporation, or organization writes $100,000,000 or 18more annually in direct premiums nationwide. This threshold 19may be altered by rule. 20    (215 ILCS 5/1815 new)21    Sec. 1815. Climate disclosure survey participation. All 22companies, corporations, and organizations subject to this   SB4006 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 19837 BAB 33287 b1Article shall, upon direction from the Department, participate 2in the National Association of Insurance Commissioners' 3Climate Risk Disclosure Survey, or any successor process 4coordinated through the National Association of Insurance 5Commissioners. 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law, except that Section 143.21e of the Illinois 8Insurance Code and the changes made to Sections 143.16 and 9143.17 of the Illinois Insurance Code take effect January 1, 102027.  SB4006 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 19837 BAB 33287 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    20 ILCS 605/871 new4    30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new5    215 ILCS 5/143.16from Ch. 73, par. 755.166    215 ILCS 5/143.17from Ch. 73, par. 755.177    215 ILCS 5/143.21e new8    215 ILCS 5/Art. XLVIII 9    heading new10    215 ILCS 5/1801 new11    215 ILCS 5/1805 new12    215 ILCS 5/1810 new13    215 ILCS 5/1815 new14    215 ILCS 5/Art. XLIX 15    heading new16    215 ILCS 5/1901 new17    215 ILCS 5/1902 new18    215 ILCS 5/1905 new19    215 ILCS 5/1910 new20    215 ILCS 5/1920 new21    215 ILCS 5/1925 new22    215 ILCS 5/1930 new23    215 ILCS 5/143.15 rep.24    215 ILCS 110/25from Ch. 32, par. 690.2525    215 ILCS 125/5-3from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1411.2  SB4006 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 19837 BAB 33287 b1    215 ILCS 130/4003from Ch. 73, par. 1504-3